Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.070

Surplus school property, rental, lease, or use of—Existing contracts not impaired.

The provisions of contracts for the use, rental or lease of school district real property executed prior to June 12, 1980, which were lawful at the time of execution shall not be impaired by such new terms and conditions to the rental, lease or occasional use of school property as may now be established by RCW 28A.335.040, 28A.335.050, and 28A.335.090.

[ 1990 c 33 s 356; 1980 c 115 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.036.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 115: See note following RCW 28A.335.090.